Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4303
Agricultural liming material, defined.

Agricultural liming material shall mean material which is distributed for agricultural purposes whose calcium and magnesium compounds are capable of neutralizing soil acidity, including limestone, burnt lime, hydrated lime, marl, an industrial byproduct, and agricultural lime slurry.

Laws 1981, LB 396, § 3;

Laws 1983, LB 539, § 2.